Nebraska, session 109, LB880.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB880 LB880
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
76-1401 Sections 76-1401 to 76-1449 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act.
Sec. 2. A landlord shall not:
(1) Prohibit a tenant from making any payment by means of an
automated clearinghouse transfer; or
(2) Charge a tenant any extra fee for a payment made by means of an
automated clearinghouse transfer.
Sec. 3. Original section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-2-